Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Chief Operating Office, is increased by $252,699, for the Office of Economic Analysis.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Financial Office, is increased by  $4,400,000, for the payment of State Data Center
charges and contracts for out-of-state tax reporting.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources  Office, is increased by $781,024, to support new client agencies
and investigation workload.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 1
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer for State Data Center operations, is in-
creased by $7,700,000, for increased costs of virtualization software.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
Workday Oregon, is increased by  $750,000, for the Statewide Payroll Transformation Project.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise goods and services, is increased by $4,982,888, to address workload associated  with
biweekly payroll transformation, procurement and risk management.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Elections Division, is increased by $2,000,000,  for the
Oregon Centralized Voter Registration system.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Corporation Division, is in-
creased by $456,397, for the digitization of records.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is increased by $134,813, for a position establishment.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (6)(a), chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Core Re-
tirement System: Core Retirement  System Applications Program Office, is increased by
$644,301, for position establishments.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (6)(b), chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Core Re-
tirement System: ORION modernization implementation, is increased by $1,336,500, for con-
sulting services.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (6)(d), chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 2
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees  Retirement System, for legacy stabili-
zation and technology readiness, is increased by $938,000, for data cleaning.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 400, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for distilled
spirits, public safety, administration and agency support, is increased by $4,783,827, for the
warehouse management information technology project.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Asset Management, is increased by $50,000, for the cost of issuing bonds.
SECTION 15.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (15), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
special governmental payments, is increased by  $103,500,000, for disbursement of lottery bond
proceeds carried forward from the prior biennium.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased by $2,819,680, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
capital improvements, is decreased by $2,819,680, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased by $4,200,000, for the Publishing  and Distribution
program.
SECTION 19.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6,  chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services from American  Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 3
Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for purposes
other than those specified in section 5, chapter 517, Oregon Laws  2025, is increased by
$1,033,627, for transfer to the  Department of Corrections for provision of public safety ser-
vices.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 553, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
553, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for Information
System projects, is decreased by  $2,000,000, for the Electronic Valuation Information System
project.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Elections Division, is increased by  $2,000,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Secretary of State by section 1 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  the Administrative Services Division, is decreased by
$2,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Library by section 1, chapter 399,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $141,580, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 399, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts other than those described in section 3, chapter
399, Oregon Laws 2025, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received
by the State Library, is increased by $95,000, for a position establishment.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is increased by $319,536, for position classification adjustments.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Secretary of State, for the Audits Division, is increased
by $109,534, for a position establishment.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Secretary of State, for the Corporation Division, is in-
creased by $271,046, for position establishments.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Secretary of State, for the Administrative Services Divi-
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 4
sion, is increased by $1,173,279, for transition to an independent productivity information
technology solution.
SECTION 29.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,600,000, for deposit in the Universal
Representation Fund established under ORS 9.865.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (15), chapter 517, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 517, Oregon
Laws 2025, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
special governmental  payments, is increased by $5,600,000, for disbursement from the Uni-
versal Representation  Fund established under ORS 9.865 to Oregon Worker Relief, as the
fiscal agent described in ORS 9.860.
SECTION 31.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 553,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Personal Tax  and Compliance Division, is increased
by $58,534, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1507).
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 553, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
553, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $1,473, for implementation  of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1507).
SECTION 33.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $576,134, for  the Office of the State Chief
Information Officer, for budgetary adjustments related to  the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act
(United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 34.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2027,  out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for distribution to the following
entities, for the following purposes:
(1) $450,000 to Glide  Revitalization for the Glide Revitalization Community Resource
Center.
(2) $840,000 to the Blue Mountain Translator District  for the Critical Electrical Distrib-
ution Line Reconstruction project.
(3) $550,000 to Riddle School District 70 for the Riddle Elementary schoolyard project.
(4) $100,000 to the City  of Detroit for recovery efforts from the December 16-17, 2025,
windstorm.
(5) $1,000,000 to the City of  Eugene for the Eugene Airport replacement and relocation
of Gate A6 passenger boarding bridge project.
(6) $1,000,000 to the ABC House (The Children’s Advocacy  Center Serving Benton and
Linn Counties) for expansion of the ABC House building.
(7) $173,000 to Banks Fire District #13 for the Banks Fire District Hornshuh Creek Fire
Station #14 Access Safety Improvements project.
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon  Department
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 5
of Administrative Services, for the provision of grants to the following entities for  the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) $1,400,000 to Our Home  Inclusive Community Collaborative for the Cathedral Park
Cohousing project.
(2) $3,000,000 to the Regional Rural Revitalization  (R3) Strategies Consortium for the
Rural Oregon Modular Mass Timber Workforce Housing project.
(3) $2,500,000 to Evergreen Community Partners  for the Whale Watch affordable housing
project.
(4) $4,000,000 to the Native American Youth and Family Center (NAYA) for roof replace-
ment and facilities upgrades.
(5) $1,100,000 to the Central Oregon Coast Fire and  Rescue District for the Fire Hall ac-
quisition.
(6) $1,750,000 to Consejo Hispano for Casa Mariposa.
(7) $11,500,000 to Williams & Russell CDC for a business hub.
(8) $5,000,000 to Clackamas County for the Clackamas County Recovery Campus.
(9) $1,500,000 to the City of McMinnville for the NE Gateway Alpine Avenue Street Im-
provement Project, Phase 2A.
(10) $1,350,000 to the City of  Salem for the McNary Field Resiliency and Emergency Ca-
pability and Terminal Master Plan project.
SECTION 36.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$496,797 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,400,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services, for special governmental payments, for the costs of bond
issuance.
SECTION 38.
 Section 110, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 110.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts are es-
tablished for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected  or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, for the provision of grants to the following entities, for the following  purposes, in the fol-
lowing  amounts:
(1) City of Beaverton for the Meadowlark Senior Housing Project: $3,041,482.
(2) Oregon Museum of Science and  Industry for construction of OMSI district infrastructure to
support affordable housing and mixed use development: $5,073,845.
(3) Mid-Willamette Family YMCA Veterans Housing for the Albany Veterans  Apartments
Project: $3,402,760.
(4) City of Gresham for the Fire Station 74 replacement project: $8,091,785.
(5) Central Oregon Intergovernmental Council for  the CORE3 emergency coordination center
and public safety training facility: $10,128,616.
(6) McMinnville Fire District for a new fire station: $3,041,482.
(7) Lane County for the Lane Stabilization Center: $14,658,694.
(8) Columbia Memorial Hospital for expansion of the hospital: $6,078,256.
(9) Deschutes County for the Central Oregon Child Psychiatric Facility: $3,121,146.
(10) Mosaic  Community Health for construction of a health care campus that includes primary
care and other services: $4,045,902.
(11) Santiam Hospital and Clinics Foundation  for the Santiam Hospital and Clinics Ambulance
Facility:  $4,759,310.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 6
(12) Mittleman Jewish Community Center for deferred maintenance, enhancing the  accessibility
of the pool area and renovations to expand childcare on site: $4,045,902.
(13) Marion Polk Food Share, Inc. for acquisition of property to allow for  a larger warehouse
and production kitchen: $6,080,215.
[(14) City of Happy Valley for the Happy Valley Community Recreation Center: $5,073,845. ]
[(15)] (14)  Willamette Falls Trust for the Willamette Falls Inter-Tribal Public  Access Project:
$45,436,500.
[(16)] (15)  Corvallis School  District 509J for the Osborn Aquatic Center Structural Rehabili-
tation Project: $4,045,902.
[(17)] (16) James Beard Public Market for creation of a public market in Portland: $10,128,616.
[(18)] (17)  Warm Springs Community  Action Team for the Warm Springs Commissary Project:
$3,843,973.
[(19)] (18) Union County Fair Association for water and wastewater improvements: $2,539,405.
SECTION 38a. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution of  $1,000,000 each
to Crook County, Harney County, Josephine County, Tillamook County and Union  County to
support horse racing events at county fairgrounds, including maintaining horse racing tracks
and building or maintaining infrastructure that enhances or  protects the safety or well-being
of racehorses.
CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for Oregon
OSHA, is increased by $200,000, for on-site Occupational Safety and Health Act training.
SECTION 40.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Central Services Division, is increased by $211,015, for classification  and compensation ad-
justments.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Building Codes Division, is increased by $3,500, for classification and  compensation adjust-
ments.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Workers’ Compensation Board, is increased by $851,988, for compensation adjustments.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter 339, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 7
collected or received by the State Board  of Tax Practitioners, is increased by $100,000, for
legal expenses.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 585, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries, is increased by $74,380, for
services and supplies.
SECTION 45.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, for
Oregon OSHA, is increased by $2,606,149, for Oregon OSHA penalty structure  changes under
ORS 654.086.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Division of Financial Regulation, is decreased by $57,307,048,  for the Oregon Reinsurance
Program.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, for the Division
of Financial Regulation, is increased by $64,197,434, for the Oregon Reinsurance Program.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 8 (4), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for arts, is
increased by $5,367,756, for the Trust for Cultural Development.
SECTION 49.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 12 (2), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is increased by $3,281,050,  for the State Small Business Credit Initiative
program.
SECTION 50.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (3), chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2025, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 519, Oregon Laws
2025, collected or received by the Employment Department, for the family and  medical leave
insurance program, is increased by $2,989,139, for program and process enhancements.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 8
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and federal funds from the United States
Department of Housing  and Urban Development for contract services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the Housing  and Community Services Department, for single family housing
programs, is increased by $37,771,236, for  down payment assistance and development of af-
fordable homes for purchase.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and federal funds from the United States
Department of Housing  and Urban Development for contract services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for multifamily  rental
housing programs, is increased by $1,900,000, for affordable housing development.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services Department, for housing  stabilization programs, is in-
creased by $15,000,000, for energy efficiency projects.
SECTION 54.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (3), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services Department, for multifamily rental  housing programs, is
increased by $32,585,695, for affordable rental housing development.
SECTION 55.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (5), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services Department, for  disaster recovery and resilience, is in-
creased by $58,000,000, for wildfire recovery.
SECTION 56.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5,  chapter 526, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, is increased by $134,000, for  a federal
grant award.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$14,531,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business
Development Department, for debt service.
SECTION 58. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $280,201, for bond related activities.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 9
or received by the Housing  and Community Services Department, for Bond Activities, is de-
creased by $1,708,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$72,343,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for debt service.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 10 (2), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Business
Development Department, from the Broadband Fund  established by ORS 285A.167, for
infrastructure, is decreased by $500,125, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 62.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by $500,125, for broadband technical assistance.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 3,  chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  infrastructure, for grants approved in
section 9, chapter 109,  Oregon Laws 2024, is decreased by $14,204,299, for a budget adjust-
ment.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (2), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for  business, innovation and trade, is decreased by
$328,216, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 65.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for infrastructure, is decreased by  $2,101,362, for a
budget adjustment.
SECTION 66.
 Section 13, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Oregon Business  Devel-
opment Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
(a) Oregon  Business Development Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial Development
Loan Fund (ORS 285B.758), Credit Enhancement  Fund (ORS 285B.215) and Small Business Expansion
Loan Fund (ORS 285B.133).
(b) Special Public Works Fund (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563),  Marine Navigation
Improvement Fund (ORS 777.267), Oregon  Port Revolving Fund (ORS 285A.708), Safe Drinking Water
Revolving Loan Fund (ORS 285A.213)[ ,] and Brownfields Redevelopment Fund (ORS 285A.188) [ and
Oregon Brownfield Properties Revitalization Fund (ORS 285A.198) ].
(2) Debt service, excluding debt service on lottery revenue bonds and general obligation bonds.
SECTION 67.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 157, chapter 628, Oregon Laws  2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 10
collected or received  by the Oregon Business Development Department, for infrastructure,
for expenses from the Housing Infrastructure Project Fund established by ORS 285B.426  is
increased by $9,999,999.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is increased  by $5,000,000, for the Oregon Brownfield Properties Revitalization
Fund established by ORS 285A.198.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 4 (1), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  infrastructure, for grants approved in
section 5, chapter 103, Oregon  Laws 2024, for the City of Toledo, is decreased by $640,000, for
a budget adjustment.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 4 (2), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, for infrastructure, for grants approved in
section 5, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024, for the City  of McMinnville, is decreased by
$2,000,000, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 5 (1), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, for infrastructure, for grants approved in
section 2, chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023, for Warm Springs water and wastewater systems,
is decreased by $2,303,470, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 72.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 5 (2), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  infrastructure, for grants approved in
section 2, chapter 475, Oregon Laws  2023, for St. Helens waterfront redevelopment, is de-
creased by $161,546, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (1), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the Southern Oregon Historical Society, is decreased by
$37,209, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 74.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (2), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for Friends of the Oregon Caves  and Chateau, is decreased
by $962, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (4), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the Clatsop County  Historical Society, is decreased by
$252,992, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (5), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the Black United Fund of Oregon, is  decreased by
$224,580, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (6), chapter 616, Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 11
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the Very Little Theatre, is decreased by $36,339,  for a
budget adjustment.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 7 (7), chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for arts, for grants approved in section 496,
chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for the Portland Institute for Contemporary Art, is decreased
by $135,625, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (1), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by $167,011, for implementa-
tion of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1507).
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (2), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for business, innovation and trade, is  increased by
$1,142,010, for implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1507).
SECTION 81.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2027, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Industrial Site
Loan Fund established by ORS 285B.046.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Department, for
infrastructure, is increased  by $15,000,000, for expenditures from the Industrial Site Loan
Fund established by ORS 285B.046.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (5), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for lottery bond debt service, is increased by $2,246,549.
SECTION 84.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by $689,078, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenditures from fees, moneys
or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by the following amounts, to be distributed as grants  to the fol-
lowing entities for the following purposes:
(1) City of Vale, Water System Improvements: $3,000,000.
(2) City of Gold Hill, Gold Hill Water Lines: $1,500,000.
(3) City of Warrenton, New Wastewater Treatment Plant: $4,000,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 12
(4) City  of Philomath, N 19th Street Sewer Infrastructure for Housing Production:
$2,650,000.
(5) City of Eugene, Clear Lake Road Economic Development Infrastructure: $5,000,000.
(6) Terrebonne  Sanitary District, Terrebonne STEP Wastewater Collection System:
$2,400,000.
(7) City of Carlton, SE Carlton Water Distribution Improvements: $1,800,000.
(8) City of Lebanon, Lebanon Wastewater Treatment Plant Biosolids Project: $2,000,000.
(9) City of St. Paul, Main Water Line Repair/Replacement: $2,614,150.
(10) City of Lafayette, Canyon View Pump Station Replacement: $1,400,000.
(11) City of Chiloquin, New Regulatory Compliant Wastewater Treatment Facility:
$4,274,549.
(12) City of Silverton, New Wastewater Treatment Plant: $5,000,000.
(13) City of Grants Pass, Spalding  Industrial Park Wastewater Infrastructure Upgrade:
$2,000,000.
SECTION 86.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June  30,
2027, out of the General Fund, for infrastructure,  the following amounts, to be distributed
as grants to the following entities for the following purposes:
(1) Crescent  Sanitary District, Gilchrist/Crescent Wastewater Infrastructure Stabiliza-
tion Rehabilitation Study: $100,000.
(2) City of Falls City, Dayton Street Water-Wastewater Bridge: $700,000.
SECTION 87.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and federal funds from the United States
Department of Housing  and Urban Development for contract services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services  Department, for Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs, is decreased by $20,000,000, for housing project revolving loans.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the Housing  and Community Services Department, for Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs, is increased by $20,000,000, for below-market,  short-term loans for the
development of mixed income housing pursuant to section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026
(Enrolled Senate Bill 1567).
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter 584, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and federal funds from the United States
Department of Housing  and Urban Development for contract services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  584, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the Housing  and Community Services Department, for Bond Activities, is in-
creased by $890,000, for the costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 90. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the  Regional
Infrastructure Fund established by section 3, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, for grants to
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 13
local and tribal governments with  populations under 25,000 for infrastructure projects, in-
cluding long-range planning, research and design.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (3), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is increased  by $10,000,000, for grants to local and tribal governments with
populations under 25,000 for infrastructure projects, including long-range planning, research
and design, from the Regional Infrastructure Fund established by section 3, chapter 786,
Oregon Laws 2013.
EDUCATION PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 92.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for operations,  is increased by $468,750, for the State
School Fund modernization project.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter 548, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds and funds described in sections 12 to 16, chapter 548, Oregon  Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission programs and related grants, is decreased by $100,000, for a budget  rea-
lignment.
SECTION 94.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,607,147 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as  the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 12  to 16, chap-
ter 548, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the  Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$240,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 12  to 16, chap-
ter 548, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the  Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for debt service other than debt service described in  section 8 (2), chapter 548,
Oregon Laws 2025.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 422, Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the  State School Fund, is increased by $7,183,130, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 422, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of Educa-
tion from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the department for the State School
Fund from the Fund for Student Success established under ORS 327.001, is decreased by
$7,183,130, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 98.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5,  chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 14
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated
from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund for deposit in the School
Capital Matching Fund established  under ORS 286A.806 as described in section 4, Article
XI-P, of the Oregon Constitution, is decreased by $2,710,537, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by  the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, for general oper-
ations, is decreased by $1,162,523, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 100.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter  607, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department  of Early Learning and Care, for early learning pro-
grams, is increased by $67,232,651, for employment related day care subsidies.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  422, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to the Department of
Education for the State School Fund, is decreased by $22,339,096, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 422, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for the State School Fund, is increased by $22,339,096, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Early Learning and Care by section 1 (2), chapter 607,
Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  early learning programs, is
decreased by $34,210,392, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter  607, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, grants-
in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Early Learning and Care
from corporate activity tax funds transferred from the Early  Learning Account by the De-
partment of Education, for early learning programs, is increased by  $34,210,392, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 11, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education from the Student Investment  Account
established under ORS 327.175, is increased by $2,120,888, for grants.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (3), chapter 608, Oregon Laws  2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for youth  development programs, is increased by
$1,900,000, for the East Multnomah Outreach, Prevention, and Intervention program.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 183, chapter 628, Oregon  Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for costs of
bond issuance for community colleges, is decreased by $15,000.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  608, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 15
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of  Education for programs other than those specified in sections
7 and 16, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2025, for all other grants, is increased by $2,000,000, for
expenditures from the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
SECTION 109.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter 548,
Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, for Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and operations, is increased by $500,000,  for a Southern Oregon Uni-
versity long-term financial sustainability plan.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 548,
Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, for Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and operations, is increased  by $2,500,000, for proposals to increase
the resilience and sustainability of Oregon’s post-secondary system.
HUMAN SERVICES PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Medicaid, is increased by $289,071, for  nonstate
employee compensation changes.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for Medicaid, is increased by $395,933, for nonstate
employee compensation changes.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $38,310,820, for nonstate employee compensation changes.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $67,806,701, for nonstate employee compensation changes.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for intellectual/developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $36,400,109, for nonstate employee compensation changes.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $64,152,677, for nonstate employee compensation changes.
SECTION 117.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 16
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for central  services, is increased by $8,457,721,
for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 118. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is decreased by $723,224, for a budget  rebal-
ance.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the  Department of Human Services, for central services, is decreased by
$7,955,872, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is decreased by $772,134, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state  assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by
$106,601, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is decreased by $1,090,796, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $1,052,775, for a budget rebal-
ance.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased by
$2,421,862, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 17
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $965,025, for a budget
rebalance.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs,  is decreased
by $9,266,956, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (4), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, for vocational rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $12,201,183, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by  $2,073,047, for
a budget rebalance.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $7,343,326, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $18,141,440, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is  increased by
$35,579,425, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities - ARPA  State Fiscal Recovery
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 18
Fund moneys for long term care workforce development and emergency preparedness, is in-
creased by $437,875, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 133.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $84,937,295, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 134. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for intellectual/developmental disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $47,642,083, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is  increased
by $17,321, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 136. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $140,402,304, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 137.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$25,209,561, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by $53,390, for a budget
rebalance.
SECTION 139.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$12,373,632, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 140.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (8), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership,  is decreased
by $17,389,276, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 19
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by  $873,598, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (8), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is de-
creased by $18,204,566, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Medicaid, is  decreased by $130,201,623, for a budget
rebalance.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for behavioral health, is decreased by $8,889,286, for
a budget rebalance.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for health policy and analytics, is decreased by
$652,498, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for public health, is decreased by $1,041,449,  for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for Oregon State Hospital, is decreased by $1,143,853,
for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (6), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for central services, is decreased by $123,230, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (7), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
increased by $1,458,137, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Medicaid, is  increased by
$32,552,383, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 20
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for behavioral health, is decreased by
$43,211,683, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 152. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health policy and analytics, is in-
creased by $12,876, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 153.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public  health, is decreased by
$1,859,445, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 154. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority,  for central services, is increased by
$52,626, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 155. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, is decreased by $34,452, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (10), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $572,425, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for Medicaid, is decreased by $3,519,334, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 158.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 21
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for behavioral health, is increased by $3,519,334, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 159.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Medicaid,  is decreased by $508,443,793, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for behavioral health, is increased by $15,848,763,
for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 161. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health policy and analytics, is decreased  by
$125,709, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (4), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority,  for public health, is decreased by $110,468, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (6), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, is increased by  $17,569, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (7), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $7,197,978, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, for Medicaid, is increased by $158,406,094, for budget-
ary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget  Reconciliation Act (United States Public Law
119-21).
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for health  policy and analytics, is increased by $90,880,
for budgetary  adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United States
Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for public health, is increased by $2,490,000, for
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 22
budgetary adjustments related to the 2025  Budget Reconciliation Act (United States Public
Law 119-21).
SECTION 168. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (7), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
increased by  $799,907, for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation
Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 169. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Medicaid,  is decreased by
$156,000,000, for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation  Act (United
States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments and  enterprise-
wide costs, is increased by $90,417, for  budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget
Reconciliation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (10), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon  Laws 2025,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $1,428,616, for budgetary adjustments related  to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation
Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Medicaid,  is decreased by $204,638,399, for
budgetary adjustments related to the 2025  Budget Reconciliation Act (United States Public
Law 119-21).
SECTION 173. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health policy and  analytics, is increased by
$83,889, for budgetary adjustments related to the  2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United
States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (7), chapter  587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 587,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 23
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $602,563, for budgetary  adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation
Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for central services, is increased by $5,161,232,
for budgetary  adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United States
Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 176. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for  central services, is increased by $139,235, for budgetary ad-
justments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for central  services, is increased by $143,837,
for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United  States
Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $10,707,792, for budgetary adjustments related  to the 2025 Budget Reconcil-
iation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$65,151, for budgetary adjustments related to the  2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United
States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 180.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is decreased  by $7,882,204, for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Re-
conciliation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 24
described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $2,829,021, for  budgetary ad-
justments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$9,607,496, for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget  Reconciliation Act (United
States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $6,451,188, for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act
(United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 184.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $2,851,345,  for budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget Reconcil-
iation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $2,206,117, for budgetary adjustments related to the  2025 Budget Re-
conciliation Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (8), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Oregon Eligibility  Partnership, is increased
by $82,638,933, for budgetary adjustments related to  the 2025 Budget Reconciliation Act
(United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  549, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by  $3,637,795, for
budgetary adjustments related to the 2025 Budget  Reconciliation Act (United States Public
Law 119-21).
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (8), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for Oregon  Eligibility Partnership, is in-
creased by $8,678,575, for budgetary adjustments related to the  2025 Budget Reconciliation
Act (United States Public Law 119-21).
SECTION 189. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 25
2025, for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$3,481,309, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 549,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 549, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs,  is decreased by $3,481,309, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$345,225,261 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2,
chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for the
Rural Health Transformation Program.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4)(a), chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2025,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for behavioral  health workforce
-American Rescue Plan Act, is decreased by $7,047,278, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 193. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 549, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$2,000,000, for refugee assistance.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$70,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Judicial Depart-
ment, for debt service.
SECTION 195.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for judicial compensation, is decreased by $330,064, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (3),  chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for mandated  payments, is decreased by $807,181, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 197. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (4), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for state court technology systems, is decreased by
$52,805, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (5),  chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for debt service, is decreased by $18,210, for a budget re-
alignment.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 26
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (6), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for third-party debt collection, is decreased  by $2,069,266,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 200. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  operations, is increased by $3,277,526, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 201. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  522, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section
2, chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the  Judicial Department, for the
State Court Facilities and Security Account, is decreased by $6,940,350, for a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 202.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (7),  chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the State Court Facilities  and Security Account, is
increased by $6,940,350, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 203. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, out of the General
Fund, the  amount of $2,400,000, for distribution to the Oregon State Bar for immigration le-
gal services.
NATURAL RESOURCES PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  419, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 419,
Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $372,490, for a Japanese beetle market access program.
SECTION 205.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 426, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for agency management, is increased by
$1,121,515, for cyberattack response and recovery.
SECTION 206. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  520, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter 520, Oregon Laws 2025,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for capital improvement, is  increased by $1,502,845, for rebuilding the
Klamath Hatchery hatch house.
SECTION 207. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  609, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the State Forestry Department, for agency  administration, is increased by $5,700,000, for
federal indirect charges.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 27
SECTION 208. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 609, Oregon  Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for fire protection, is increased by  $11,600,000,
for centralized administration costs.
SECTION 209. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 609,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the State Forestry Department, for fire  protection, is increased by $4,984,799, to imple-
ment the Community Wildfire Defense Grant.
SECTION 210. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 609, Oregon Laws
2025, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for fire protection, is increased by $69,463,157,
for the 2025 fire season.
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  609, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2025, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for fire  protection, is increased by $73,600,000,
for the 2025 fire season.
SECTION 212. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 551,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, for
the planning program, is increased by $202,013, for interagency agreements.
SECTION 213. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  551, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of Land Conservation and Development,  is increased by
$4,599,793, for National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration grant projects.
SECTION 214. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter 338,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for  South Slough National Estuarine
Research Reserve operations, is increased by $2,002,800, for land acquisition.
SECTION 215. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5, chapter  338, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses by the Department of State
Lands from the Oregon Ocean  Science Fund established by ORS 196.567, is increased by
$300,000, for contract services and related expenses.
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 363,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the State Marine Board, for facilities construction and main-
tenance, is increased by $216,000, for waterway  access improvements and related program
activities.
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 363,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 28
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the State Marine Board, for  aquatic invasive species, is in-
creased by $832,182, for aquatic invasive species prevention and monitoring activities.
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 524,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the State Parks and Recreation Department, for community
support and grants,  is increased by $10,000,000, for the Oregon Main Street Revitalization
Grant Program.
SECTION 219. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$459,722 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Water Resources Department, for support of
fee-based programs.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  527, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for grants,  is
increased by $35,000,000, for projects approved by the Environmental Restoration Council.
SECTION 221. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $9,000
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the pro-
ceeds of bonds for the Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation and
air quality grants, drinking water protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants
and for smoke  monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  2, chapter 426, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the De-
partment of Environmental Quality, for debt service.
SECTION 222.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,564,960 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and including federal funds received under cooperative agreements  with or contracts from
the Bureau of Reclamation of  the United States Department of the Interior, the United
States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power
Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding  lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section 3, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2025,  collected or re-
ceived by the Water Resources Department, for debt service.
SECTION 223.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 551,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, for
grant programs, is increased by $4,350,409, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (2),
chapter 551, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for grant programs,
is decreased by $3,500,000, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 225. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Department of Land Conservation and Development, for the biennium ending
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 29
June 30, 2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $3,500,000, for deposit into the Housing
Accountability and Production Office Fund established by ORS 197A.820,  for housing-related
grants.
SECTION 226. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (1), chapter 611, Oregon  Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for administrative services, is increased  by
$391,747, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter 611, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for field services, is decreased by $660,026, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 228.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (3), chapter 611, Oregon  Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for water  rights and adjudications, is increased
by $472,502, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 229. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter 611, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for technical services, is decreased by  $65,863,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 230. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter 611, Oregon  Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the director’s office,  is decreased by $138,360,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 231. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for administrative services, is increased by $8,002, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 232. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for field services, is increased by $19,643, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 233. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 30
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for water rights and adjudications, is decreased by $23,332, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 234. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is decreased by $4,313, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 235. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is decreased by $1,000,000, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 236. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for the director’s office, is increased by $1,000,000, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 237. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1, chapter 334, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $75,000, for information technol-
ogy.
SECTION 238.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1, chapter 334, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $8,000, for shared services.
SECTION 239. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1, chapter 334, Oregon Laws
2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is  increased by $45,000, for commission expenses.
SECTION 240. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter 426, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2027, for land quality, is increased by $407,871,
for the 2025 Rowena fire.
SECTION 241. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Land Use Board  of Appeals by section 1, chapter 428, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $33,504, for Oregon Department of
Administrative Services charges.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 31
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 428, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $24,025, for  contract human resources.
SECTION 243. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 424, Oregon Laws  2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Department  of Energy, is increased by $513,984, for climate
strategy and initiatives.
SECTION 244.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  424, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the  State Department of Energy, is increased by $1,819,810, for solar
electric systems and storage.
SECTION 245.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries by  section 1 (2),
chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for mined land recla-
mation, is increased by $700,000, for ePermitting.
SECTION 246. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  424, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the State Department of Energy, is increased by $834,361, for the
Heat Pump Deployment Program.
SECTION 247.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  424, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by  the State Department of Energy, is increased by $3,060,871, for the
Oregon Rental Home Heat Pump Program.
SECTION 248.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (6), chapter 520, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  State Police enforcement, is decreased
by $3,118,767, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 249. The allocation to the Department of Environmental Quality  of moneys
deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by section 5,  chapter 527, Oregon
Laws 2025, for activities and  projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon
Constitution, is increased by $250,000.
SECTION 250. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (3), chapter 419, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for natural resources, is increased by
$1,800,000, for Japanese beetle eradication.
SECTION 251.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Agriculture by section 1 (1), chapter 419, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for administrative and support services,
is increased by $1,000,000, for deposit in the Wolf Management Compensation and Proactive
Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155, for grants.
SECTION 252. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Parks and Recreation Department  by section 1, chapter 524, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by $274,590, for debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 32
SECTION 253. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 524,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the  State Parks and Recreation Department, for central ser-
vices, is increased by $35,000, for the cost of bond issuance.
PUBLIC SAFETY PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 254. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for operations and health services, is increased by
$21,522,020, for medications for opioid use disorder.
SECTION 255. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for operations and health services, is increased by
$14,352,000, for offsite healthcare.
SECTION 256. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for operations and health services, is increased by
$4,055,147, for healthcare staffing.
SECTION 257. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$69,791 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses by the Department of Justice from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus
State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services and transferred to the Department of Justice, for survivor housing services.
SECTION 258.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$37,302 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses by the Department of Justice from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus
State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services and transferred to the Department of Justice, for community-based violence pre-
vention.
SECTION 259.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 523,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division, is increased by $1,191,525, for children’s advocacy centers and domestic
violence and sexual assault services.
SECTION 260.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  423, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for mit-
igation and recovery, is increased by $15,791,030, for natural disaster reimbursements.
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  the State Fire Marshal by section 1 (3), chapter 554, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for emergency response,  is increased by
$7,621,128, for 2025 fire season costs.
SECTION 262. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  the State Fire Marshal by section 1 (3), chapter 554, Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 33
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for emergency response,  is increased by
$7,000,000, for the 2026 fire season.
SECTION 263. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 554,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the office of
the State Fire Marshal, business services, emergency response, fire  and life safety services
and fire and life safety education, is increased by $500,000, for fire cost recovery.
SECTION 264.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (7)(a), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Court  Mandated Expenses Division:
standard court mandated expenses, is decreased by $2,131,986, for state trial attorneys.
SECTION 265. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Trial  Representation Division, is
increased by $2,131,986, for state trial attorneys.
SECTION 266. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for operations and health services, is decreased by
$1,033,627, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 267.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  70, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund mon-
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Department of Corrections, for operations  and health services, is increased by $1,033,627, for
the provision of public safety services.
SECTION 268.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 523, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Crime Victim  and Survivor Services Division, is
decreased by $9,350,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 269. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $6,050,000, for deposit into the Oregon Domestic and Sexual
Violence Services Fund established by ORS 147.453.
SECTION 270. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,300,000, for deposit into the Children’s Advocacy Center Fund
established by ORS 418.801.
SECTION 271.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 523,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is decreased by $2,145,360, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 272. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  79, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for protection and education,  for
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 34
civil enforcement expansion and defense  of state interests, is decreased by $8,191,890, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 273. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  78, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for protection and education,  for
the purpose of carrying out ORS 180.095, is increased  by $10,337,250, for a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 274. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 459, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for  facility programs, is decreased by $15,909, for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 275. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 459,  Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for community programs, is decreased by $24,122, for
a budget rebalance.
SECTION 276.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 459,  Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for program support, is increased by $40,031,  for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 277. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 588,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Public Defense Commission, for Court Mandated
Expenses, is decreased by $952,073, for a budget adjustment.
SECTION 278. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2027, is increased by $87,842, for sentencing, policy and re-
search, for contract human resources.
SECTION 279. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  423, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for the
9-1-1 Emergency Program, is increased by $5,300,000, for Next Generation 9-1-1.
SECTION 280. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 423,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Emergency Management, for Mitigation
and Recovery, is decreased by $602,043, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 281. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 423,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for  adminis-
tration, is increased by $602,043, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 282. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 459, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,  for program support, is increased by $320,336, for
processing Medicaid claims.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 35
SECTION 283. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 459,  Oregon Laws 2025,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for program  support, is increased by $335,138, for in-
formation technology project management.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 523, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June  30, 2027, for the Criminal Justice Division, is increased by
$1,046,286, for Internet crimes against children.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 554,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the office of
the State Fire Marshal, business services, emergency response, fire  and life safety services
and fire and life safety  education, is increased by $9,509,777, for the community risk re-
duction program.
SECTION 286.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  the State Fire Marshal by section 1 (3), chapter 554, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for emergency response, is increased by
$6,000,000, for wildfire season staffing grants.
SECTION 287. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section  1, chapter
402, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, is increased by  $319,148, for
contested for contested post-prison and parole violation hearings.
SECTION 288. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 455,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of State Police, for Fish and Wildlife, is de-
creased by $3,118,767, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 289. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (2), chapter 455, Oregon Laws 2025,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Fish and Wildlife, is increased by $3,118,767, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 290.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Executive Division, is increased
by $323,866, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 291.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (2), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Compliance, Audit and Performance
Division, is decreased by $2,903,473, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 292. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Oregon Public Defense Commission by section 1 (10)(a), chapter 588,
Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Administrative Services
Division, for administrative services, is decreased by $249,231, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 293. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by section 1 (10)(b),  chapter 588,
Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the  Administrative Services
Division, for the financial case management system, is  decreased by $323,866, for a budget
realignment.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 36
SECTION 294. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Public Defense Commission, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $3,152,704, for the establishment of  a Resource Counsel
Division.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (4), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Adult Trial Division, is decreased
by $1,899,995, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 296. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 588, Oregon
Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Trial  Representation Division, is
increased by $1,508,175, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 297. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Oregon Public Defense Commission by section 1 (10)(a), chapter 588,
Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Administrative Services
Division - administrative services, is increased by $391,820, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 298. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter  523, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division, is decreased by $1,274,557, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 299. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 523, Oregon Laws 2025, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Crime Victim  and Survivor Services Division, is
increased by $1,274,557, for a budget realignment.
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM AREA
SECTION 300. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the
Department of Transportation, for policy, data and analysis, is increased by  $1,108,198, for a
State Electronic Data Collection Program grant to replace the Crash Data System.
SECTION 301.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (12), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for finance and budget, is decreased by $463,336, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 302.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (11), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department  of Transportation, for Department of Transportation administrative ser-
vices, is increased by $463,336, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 37
SECTION 303. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the  Department of Transportation, for policy, data and analysis, is decreased by $242,725,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 304. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation,  for project delivery and support, is increased by
$242,725, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 305. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 634,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of  Transportation, for project delivery and support, is decreased by
$750,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 306. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (11), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for Department of Transportation  administrative ser-
vices, is increased by $750,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 307. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 634,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for maintenance, is decreased by $13,348,731,  for a
budget rebalance.
SECTION 308. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for project delivery and support,  is decreased by
$32,206,996, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 309. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 634,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 38
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of  Transportation, for the local government program, is decreased by
$973,840, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 310. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 634,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the  Department of Transportation, for driver and motor vehicle services, is decreased by
$8,483,935, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 311. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation,  for commerce and compliance, is decreased by
$2,775,301, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 312. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (11), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department  of Transportation, for Department of Transportation administrative ser-
vices, is decreased by $11,889,911, for a budget rebalance.
SECTION 313. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (12), chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for finance and budget,  is decreased by $4,421,103, for
a budget rebalance.
SECTION 314. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 634,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 634, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation,  for capital improvement, is decreased by $4,100,000, for
a budget rebalance.
EMERGENCY BOARD
SECTION 315. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 628, Oregon  Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, to be allocated  to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining  for workers who are not state employees, is decreased by
$75,000,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 39
SECTION 316. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 628, Oregon  Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027,  to be allocated for the state’s natural disaster prevention,
preparedness, response and recovery, is decreased by $65,324,786.
SECTION 317. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 6 (1), chapter 628, Oregon  Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, to be allocated to the State Forestry Department  for fire
protection expenses, is decreased by $12,167,370.
SECTION 318. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 2 (1), chapter 628, Oregon  Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, to be allocated to state  agencies for state employee compen-
sation changes, is decreased by $300,000,000.
SECTION 319. Section 4, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated  to the
Emergency  Board,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$100,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon  Health Authority and the Department of Human Services
for [ caseload costs ] costs associated with caseload  changes and implementation of federal pol-
icy changes that  the agencies are unable to mitigate during the interim legislative periods.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this  section are not allocated by the
Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date  become available
for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 320. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $15,000,000, to be allocated to the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission for the purpose of  supporting Southern Oregon University with short-term fi-
nancial stability.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
GENERAL FUND CARRYFORWARD
SECTION 321. Legislative Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  au-
thorized appropriations for the  biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the following agencies and
programs are changed by the amounts specified for 2023-2025  unexpended General Fund ap-
propriations as authorized under ORS 293.195:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 586 1(1) +10,387,701
Legislative Assembly:
General Fund Ch. 586 6 +3,219,928
Eighty-third
Legislative Assembly
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 40
General Fund Ch. 586 7(1) +321,607
Eighty-fourth
Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 586 7(2) +1,408,101
Legislative Equity Office
General Fund Ch. 586 8 +986,715
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Fund Ch. 586 11 +1,876,804
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 14(1) +640,211
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
General Fund Ch. 586 15 +1,486,555
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 16 +334,458
Commission on Indian
Services:
General Fund Ch. 586 17 +38,710
SECTION 322. Judicial Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for the following agencies and
programs are changed by the  amounts specified for 2023-2025 unexpended General Fund ap-
propriations as authorized under ORS 293.195:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 398 1(1) +10,912
Extraordinary Expenses
General Fund Ch. 398 1(2) +18,337
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund Ch. 522 1(1) +330,064
Operations
General Fund Ch. 522 1(2) +754,511
Mandated Payments
General Fund Ch. 522 1(3) +807,181
State Court Technology
Systems
General Fund Ch. 522 1(4) +52,805
Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 41
General Fund Ch. 522 1(5) +18,210
Third-party Debt
Collection
General Fund Ch. 522 1(6) +2,069,266
DEBT SERVICE ADJUSTMENTS
SECTION 323. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2027, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Administration:
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
Other Funds Ch. 517 2(13) -50,000
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
Debt service
Other Funds Ch. 400 1(7) -8,915,136
Department of Revenue:
Debt service
Other Funds Ch. 628 114 +380,000
Debt service and
related costs
General Fund Ch. 553 1(7) -1,034,009
Economic Development:
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 616 1(4) -5,375,000
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Debt Service for Bond
Related Activities
General Fund Ch. 584 1(7) -66,280,201
Education:
Department of Education:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 608 4 -760,000
Other funds Ch. 628 189 +1,145,000
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt service on outstanding
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 42
general obligation bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities
General Fund Ch. 548 1(11)(a)-3,460,670
Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities
Other funds Ch. 548 8(2) +1,094,758
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold for implementing the
Financial Assistance
Management Information
Systems project
General Fund Ch. 548 1(11)(d) -50,000
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon community
colleges
General Fund Ch. 548 1(11)(b)+350,319
Human Services:
Oregon Health Authority:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 587 1(9) -310,000
Other funds Ch. 628 127 +405,000
Department of Human Services:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 549 1(9) -1,560,000
Other funds Ch. 628 50 +1,610,000
Judicial Branch:
Judicial Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 522 1(5) -2,211,839
Legislative Branch:
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 586 1(2) -1,436,100
Other Funds Ch. 628 202 +1,505,000
Natural Resources:
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 426 1(5) +45,000
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 520 1(4) -226,900
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 43
Other funds Ch. 520 2(5) +375,000
State Forestry Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 609 1(4) -69,925
Other funds Ch. 609 2(6) +15,771
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 524 1 -1,930,000
Other funds Ch. 628 195 +4,800,000
Lottery Funds Ch. 524 4 -2,500,000
Water Resources Department:
Debt Service
Lottery Funds Ch. 611 2 -1,564,950
Public Safety:
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 583 1(5) -3,162,500
Other funds Ch. 628 71 +3,688,000
Department of Justice:
Debt Service and Related
Costs
Other funds Ch. 523 2(10) -2,620,974
Oregon Military Department:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 628 192 +846,000
Capital Debt Service and
Related Costs
General Fund Ch. 429 1(4) -666,900
Oregon Department of
Emergency Management:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 423 1(4) -2,200,103
Other funds Ch. 628 87 +430,000
Department of State Police:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 628 193 +4,155,000
Bond Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 455 1(5) -4,528,346
Oregon Youth Authority:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 459 1(6) -8,463,771
Other funds Ch. 628 99 +1,180,000
Transportation:
Department of Transportation:
Debt service
Other Funds Ch. 634 2(13) +21,200,516
COMPENSATION PLAN AND OTHER ADJUSTMENTS
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 44
SECTION 324. Administration. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
For start-up costs associated
with implementing sections
1 to 11, chapter 481,
Oregon Laws 2025
General Fund Ch. 481 13 +26,108
Chief Operating Office
General Fund Ch. 517 1(1) +7,426
Other funds Ch. 517 2(1) +420,911
To expend for the purposes
described in section 1,
chapter 481, Oregon Laws
2025
General Fund Ch. 596 3 +13,219
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
information technology
Other funds Ch. 517 2(14) +718,212
Chief Financial Office
Other funds Ch. 517 2(2) +1,114,985
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer:
Policy
Other funds Ch. 517
2(3)(a) +2,213,640
Chief Human Resources Office
Other funds Ch. 517 2(4) +1,087,088
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - State
Data Center: Operations
Other funds Ch. 517
2(5)(a) +2,225,662
Workday Oregon
Other funds Ch. 517 2(6) +667,058
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds Ch. 517 2(7) +2,186,497
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds Ch. 517 2(8) +3,081,929
Business Services
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 45
Other funds Ch. 517 2(9) +78,072
American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal
Recovery Fund moneys
Federal funds Ch. 517 5 +72,108
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
General Fund Ch. 372 1 +58,410
Employment Relations Board:
General Fund Ch. 397 1 +120,605
Other funds Ch. 397 2 +10,284
Administrative Account
Other funds Ch. 397 3 +84,584
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Other funds Ch. 336 1 +178,755
Office of the Governor:
General Fund Ch. 547 1 +782,431
Regional Solutions Program
Lottery funds Ch. 547 3 +189,585
Other funds Ch. 547 4 +189,292
State Library:
General Fund Ch. 399 1 +104,760
Other funds Ch. 399 2 +40,684
Miscellaneous Receipts
Account for the State
Library
Other funds Ch. 399 3 +249,122
Federal funds Ch. 399 4 +77,885
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
Distilled spirits, public
safety, administration and
agency support
Other funds Ch. 400 1(1) +3,658,084
Marijuana regulation
- recreational
Other funds Ch. 400 1(2) +1,252,587
Marijuana regulation
- medical
Other funds Ch. 400 1(3) +210,669
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration Division
Other funds Ch. 552 1(1) +811,520
Financial Services Division
Other funds Ch. 552 1(2) +428,533
Information Services Division
Other funds Ch. 552 1(3) +1,006,307
Operations Division
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 46
Other funds Ch. 552 1(4) +2,338,642
Compliance, Audit and Risk
Division
Other funds Ch. 552 1(5) +145,899
Core Retirement System: Core
Retirement System Applications
Program Office
Other funds Ch. 552 1(6)(a) +130,762
Core Retirement System:
Chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2024,
implementation
Other funds Ch. 552 1(6)(c) +21,211
Public Records Advocate:
Other funds Ch. 249 1 +24,582
Oregon Racing Commission:
Other funds Ch. 458 1 +122,015
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 553 1(1) +772,898
Other funds Ch. 553 2(1) +258,283
Property Tax Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(2) +935,239
Other funds Ch. 553 2(2) +158,445
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(3) +3,327,462
Other funds Ch. 553 2(3) +70,401
Business Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(4) +1,071,146
Other funds Ch. 553 2(4) +714,748
Collections Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(5) +1,599,438
Other funds Ch. 553 2(5) +960,102
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(6) +1,803,005
Other funds Ch. 553 2(7) +535,095
Information System
projects
Other funds Ch. 553 2(10) +5,100
Corporate Division
Other funds Ch. 553 2(6) +687,229
Marijuana program
Other funds Ch. 553 2(8) +116,861
Senior Property Tax
Deferral program
Other funds Ch. 553 2(9) +70,749
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 610 1(1) +276,540
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 47
Other funds Ch. 610 2(1) +1,551,141
Elections Division
General Fund Ch. 610 1(2) +665,135
Audits Division
Other funds Ch. 610 2(3) +1,719,849
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 610 2(4) +475,190
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 610 2(5) +777,135
Federal funds Ch. 610 3 +28,658
State Treasurer:
Administrative services
Other funds Ch. 555 1(1) +1,472,218
Trust property services
Other funds Ch. 555 1(2) +367,004
Investment services
Other funds Ch. 555 1(3) +1,839,991
Public savings services
Other funds Ch. 555 1(4) +180,331
State and local government
financial services
Other funds Ch. 555 1(5) +509,308
SECTION 325. Consumer and Business Services.  Notwithstanding any other provision  of
law, the authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for  the biennium ending June
30, 2027, for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating expenses
Other funds Ch. 361 1 +92,725
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating expenses
Other funds Ch. 333 1 +50,384
Construction Contractors Board:
Other funds Ch. 247 1 +710,844
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Universal Health Plan
Governance Board
General Fund Ch. 606 3 +54,421
New permitting-related
requirements under
chapter 486, Oregon
Laws 2025
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 48
General Fund Ch. 628 205 +10,470
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds Ch. 606 1(1) +1,060,139
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 606 1(2) +2,369,995
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 606 1(3) +2,289,480
Federal funds Ch. 606 2(1) +532,337
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 606 1(4) +2,486,364
Federal funds Ch. 606 2(2) +21,196
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds Ch. 606 1(5) +2,757,862
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 606 1(6) +1,763,010
Federal funds Ch. 606 2(3) +7,865
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating expenses
Other funds Ch. 335 1 +113,733
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds Ch. 427 1 +94,055
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds Ch. 427 2 +29,364
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 427 3 +16,674
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 427 4 +43,802
State Board of Examiners for
Speech-Language Pathology
and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 427 5 +27,373
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 427 6 +58,458
Bureau of Labor and Industries:
General Fund Ch. 585 1 +1,295,620
Other funds Ch. 585 2 +1,360,125
Lottery funds Ch. 585 5 +6,898
Federal funds Ch. 585 4 +55,334
Oregon Medical Board:
Other funds Ch. 364 1 +524,306
Mental Health Regulatory
Agencies:
Oregon Board of Licensed
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 49
Professional Counselors and
Therapists
Other funds Ch. 337 1 +149,580
Oregon Board of Psychology
Other funds Ch. 337 2 +47,963
Oregon State Board of Nursing:
Other funds Ch. 401 1 +821,026
State Board of Pharmacy:
Other funds Ch. 365 1 +332,337
Public Utility Commission:
Utility program
Other funds Ch. 457 1(1) +1,612,555
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 457 1(2) +78,779
Administration
Other funds Ch. 457 1(3) +326,570
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 457 1(4) +31,461
Federal funds Ch. 457 2 +56,378
Real Estate Agency:
Other funds Ch. 366 1 +357,944
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Other funds Ch. 362 1 +105,917
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Other funds Ch. 339 1 +19,824
SECTION 326. Economic Development.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 616 1(1) +13,072
Other funds Ch. 616 8(1) +277,008
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(1) +637,087
Federal funds Ch. 616 12(1) +66,467
Infrastructure
General Fund Ch. 616 1(2) +25,898
Other funds Ch. 616 8(3) +380,121
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(3) +229,940
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 50
Federal funds Ch. 616 12(3) +176,341
Arts
General Fund Ch. 616 1(3) +46,605
Other funds Ch. 616 8(4) +89,097
Business, innovation and trade
Other funds Ch. 616 8(2) +528,120
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(2) +351,507
Federal funds Ch. 616 12(2) +89,830
Employment Department:
Unemployment insurance, shared
services, workforce operations,
contributions and recovery, and
workforce and economic research
Other funds Ch. 519 1(1) +10,442,112
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds Ch. 519 1(2) +1,630,963
Family and medical leave
insurance program
Other funds Ch. 519 1(3) +4,501,309
Modernization Initiative
Other funds Ch. 519 1(4) +583,629
Federal funds Ch. 519 4 +6,042,649
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Housing Stabilization
Programs
General Fund Ch. 584 1(1) +504,094
Other funds Ch. 584 2(1) +386,186
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(1) +166,617
Project-Based Rental
Housing Assistance
General Fund Ch. 584 1(2) +13,123
Other funds Ch. 584 2(2) +296,062
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(2) +7,934
Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs
General Fund Ch. 584 1(3) +96,119
Other funds Ch. 584 2(3) +1,951,098
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(3) +52,971
Single Family Housing
Programs
General Fund Ch. 584 1(4) +100,891
Other funds Ch. 584 2(4) +291,337
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(4) -33,487
Disaster Recovery and
Resilience
General Fund Ch. 584 1(5) +30,521
Other funds Ch. 584 2(5) +37,794
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(5) +589,859
Central Services
General Fund Ch. 584 1(6) +421,022
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 51
Other funds Ch. 584 2(6) +1,514,163
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(6) +161,956
Bond Activities
Other funds Ch. 584 2(7) +106,875
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 526 1(1) +11,165
Other funds Ch. 526 4(1)(a) +539,222
Lottery funds Ch. 526 2(1) +97,104
Appeals and special advocacy
General Fund Ch. 526 1(2) +199,625
Lottery funds Ch. 526 2(2) +21,133
Strategic partnership
General Fund Ch. 526 1(3) +61,640
Lottery funds Ch. 526 2(3) +73,403
Aging veteran services
General Fund Ch. 526 1(4) +22,525
Lottery funds Ch. 526 2(4) +93,951
Home loan program
Other funds Ch. 526 4(1)(b) +174,353
Oregon Veterans’ Home program
Other funds Ch. 526 4(1)(c) +45,708
Federal funds Ch. 526 5 +34,041
SECTION 327. Education. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Early Learning
and Care:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 607 1(1) +2,693,344
Other funds Ch. 607 3(1) +199,537
Other funds Ch. 607 5(1) +192,502
Federal funds Ch. 607 4(1) +1,767,419
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 608 1(1) +3,652,387
Other funds Ch. 608 15 +1,382,285
Other funds Ch. 608 7(2) +1,004,518
Federal funds Ch. 608 9(1) +1,774,503
Oregon School for the Deaf
General Fund Ch. 608 1(2) +707,692
Other funds Ch. 608 7(3) +115,812
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 52
Federal funds Ch. 608 9(2) +7,763
Higher Education Coordinating
Commission:
Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
operations
General Fund Ch. 548 1(1) +1,464,208
Oregon Promise grants
General Fund Ch. 548 1(5) +41,384
Oregon Tribal Student Grant
General Fund Ch. 548 1(6) +22,863
Oregon National Guard
tuition assistance
General Fund Ch. 548 1(7) +24,776
Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
related grants
Other funds Ch. 548 8(1) +628,394
Federal funds Ch. 548 11 +430,888
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
General Fund Ch. 525 1 +22,892
General operations
Other funds Ch. 525 2 +430,248
SECTION 328. Human Services.  Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission for the Blind:
General Fund Ch. 454 1 +273,207
Other funds Ch. 454 2 +5,750
Federal funds Ch. 454 3 +589,454
Oregon Health Authority:
Medicaid
General Fund Ch. 587 1(1) +3,056,643
Other funds Ch. 587 2(1) +140,482
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(1) +2,940,888
Behavioral health
General Fund Ch. 587 1(2) +1,903,412
Other funds Ch. 587 2(2) +435,428
Lottery funds Ch. 587 3(2) +72,783
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(2) +843,420
Health policy and analytics
General Fund Ch. 587 1(3) +1,689,177
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 53
Other funds Ch. 587 2(3) +1,195,863
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(3) +1,013,841
Public health
General Fund Ch. 587 1(4) +2,467,833
Other funds Ch. 587 2(5) +4,207,853
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(4) +6,048,516
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund Ch. 587 1(5) +38,598,311
Other funds Ch. 587 2(7) +289,828
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(5) +1,145,404
Central services
General Fund Ch. 587 1(6) +3,082,159
Other funds Ch. 587 2(8) +1,149,703
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(6) +911,358
State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs
General Fund Ch. 587 1(7) +2,576,465
Other funds Ch. 587 2(9) +344,690
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(7) +1,226,987
Shared administrative
services
Other funds Ch. 587 2(10) +8,903,458
Department of Human Services:
Central services
General Fund Ch. 549 1(1) +3,146,082
Other funds Ch. 549 2(1) +80,298
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(1) +2,188,775
State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(2) +6,136,948
Other funds Ch. 549 2(2) +243,082
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(2) +3,611,547
Self-sufficiency programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(3) +5,799,788
Other funds Ch. 549 2(3) +9,689
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(3) +6,915,069
Vocational rehabilitation
services
General Fund Ch. 549 1(4) +855,775
Other funds Ch. 549 2(4) +49,413
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(4) +2,627,218
Child welfare programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(5) +32,659,161
Other funds Ch. 549 2(5) +29,556
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(5) +12,808,417
Aging and people with
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(6) +8,979,532
Other funds Ch. 549 2(6) +1,676,569
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(6) +9,917,802
Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 54
General Fund Ch. 549 1(7) +4,802,206
Other funds Ch. 549 2(7) -1,033
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(7) +7,088,312
Oregon Eligibility Partnership
General Fund Ch. 549 1(8) +16,623,071
Other funds Ch. 549 2(9) +46,119
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(8) +13,489,036
Shared services
Other funds Ch. 549 2(8) +9,381,458
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General program and services
provided to care facility
residents
General Fund Ch. 615 1(1) +267,835
Public guardian and
conservator program
General Fund Ch. 615 1(2) +268,262
Other funds Ch. 615 2 +36,897
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
General Fund Ch. 456 1 +172,490
SECTION 329. Judicial Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Judicial compensation
General Fund Ch. 522 1(1) +3,955,133
Operations
General Fund Ch. 522 1(2) +33,976,049
Other funds Ch. 522 2(1) +843,119
Mandated payments
General Fund Ch. 522 1(3) +426,356
Other funds Ch. 522 2(2) +7,872
State Court Facilities and
Security Account
General Fund Ch. 522 1(7) +31,231
Other funds Ch. 522 2(3) +73,300
State Court Technology Fund
Other funds Ch. 522 2(4) +764,461
Federal funds Ch. 522 3 +240,043
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 55
General Fund Ch. 398 1(1) +33,004
SECTION 330. Legislative Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Indian Services:
General Fund Ch. 586 17 +65,120
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General program
General Fund Ch. 586 1(1) +1,157,870
Other funds Ch. 586 2 +1,199
Legislative Assembly:
General Fund Ch. 586 6 +792,929
Eighty-third Legislative
Assembly of the State of
Oregon
General Fund Ch. 586 7(1) +1,538,941
Eighty-fourth Legislative
Assembly of the State of
Oregon
General Fund Ch. 586 7(2) +548,277
Legislative Counsel Committee:
General Fund Ch. 586 11 +838,749
Other funds Ch. 586 12 +122,307
Legislative Equity Office:
General Fund Ch. 586 8 +27,147
Legislative Fiscal Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 14(1) +343,062
Other funds Ch. 586 14(2) +210,485
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
General Fund Ch. 586 15 +973,516
Legislative Revenue Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 16 +205,851
SECTION 331. Natural Resources.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 56
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and support
services
General Fund Ch. 419 1(1) +146,266
Other funds Ch. 419 2(1) +481,717
Food safety
General Fund Ch. 419 1(2) +438,606
Other funds Ch. 419 2(2) +1,077,439
Federal funds Ch. 419 4(1) +12,321
Natural resources
General Fund Ch. 419 1(3) +431,452
Other funds Ch. 419 2(3) +928,353
Federal funds Ch. 419 4(2) +217,807
Market access
General Fund Ch. 419 1(4) +94,637
Other funds Ch. 419 2(4) +837,186
Federal funds Ch. 419 4(3) +113,220
Parks and Natural Resources
Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 419 3 +363,130
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 334 1 +455
State Department of Energy:
Energy planning and innovation
General Fund Ch. 424 1(1) +152,860
Energy development services
General Fund Ch. 424 1(2) +75,636
Nuclear safety and emergency
response
General Fund Ch. 424 1(3) +6,940
Administrative services
General Fund Ch. 424 1(4) +37,868
Other funds Ch. 424 2 +1,255,279
Federal funds Ch. 424 3 +249,879
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air quality
General Fund Ch. 426 1(1) +983,699
Other funds Ch. 426 2(1) +2,701,928
Federal funds Ch. 426 5(1) +421,639
Water quality
General Fund Ch. 426 1(2) +2,357,975
Other funds Ch. 426 2(2) +1,344,319
Federal funds Ch. 426 5(2) +356,999
Land quality
General Fund Ch. 426 1(3) +77,136
Other funds Ch. 426 2(3) +2,801,781
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 57
Federal funds Ch. 426 5(3) +329,485
Agency management
General Fund Ch. 426 1(4) +67,820
Other funds Ch. 426 2(4) +1,374,739
Lottery funds Ch. 426 3 +226,569
Department of Fish and
Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(1) +1,010,120
Other funds Ch. 520 2(1) +2,680,447
Lottery funds Ch. 520 3(1) +225,665
Federal funds Ch. 520 5(1) +3,710,568
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(2) +271,608
Other funds Ch. 520 2(2) +1,355,986
Lottery funds Ch. 520 3(2) +44,846
Federal funds Ch. 520 5(2) +920,584
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(3) +53,748
Other funds Ch. 520 2(3) +1,452,078
Federal funds Ch. 520 5(3) +237,014
Habitat Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(7) +488,631
Other funds Ch. 520 2(7) +292,212
Federal funds Ch. 520 5(5) +366,298
Capital improvement
Other funds Ch. 520 2(4) +37,738
State Forestry Department:
Agency administration
General Fund Ch. 609 1(1) +65,880
Other funds Ch. 609 2(1) +1,695,680
Federal funds Ch. 609 4(1) +72,029
Fire protection
General Fund Ch. 609 1(2) +2,584,388
Other funds Ch. 609 2(2) +3,947,111
Federal funds Ch. 609 4(2) +332,175
Forest resources
General Fund Ch. 609 1(3) +2,272,099
Other funds Ch. 609 2(4) +831,971
Federal funds Ch. 609 4(4) +627,940
State forests
Other funds Ch. 609 2(3) +2,550,516
Equipment pool
Other funds Ch. 609 2(7) +384,168
State Department of Geology
and Mineral Industries:
Geologic survey
General Fund Ch. 521 1(1) +231,331
Other funds Ch. 521 2(1) +96,101
Mined land reclamation
General Fund Ch. 521 1(2) +13,767
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 58
Other funds Ch. 521 2(2) +311,190
Federal funds Ch. 521 3 +106,052
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
Planning program
General Fund Ch. 551 1(1) +1,213,237
Other funds Ch. 551 2(1) +201,631
Federal funds Ch. 551 3 +219,576
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 428 1 +122,989
Department of State Lands:
Wetland mitigation and
land use permitting
General Fund Ch. 628 15 +25,087
Common School Fund programs
Other funds Ch. 338 1(1) +1,465,293
South Slough National
Estuarine Research Reserve
operations
Other funds Ch. 338 1(2) +127,959
Federal funds Ch. 338 7(1) +103,754
Elliott State Research Forest
Other funds Ch. 338 1(3) +122,254
Oregon Removal-Fill Mitigation
Fund established by
ORS 196.640
Other funds Ch. 338 4 +4,872
Oregon Abandoned and Derelict
Vessel Fund established by
ORS 274.371
Other funds Ch. 338 6 +61,347
State Marine Board:
Administration and education
Other funds Ch. 363 1(1) +318,759
Marine law enforcement
Other funds Ch. 363 1(2) +112,352
Facilities construction
and maintenance
Other funds Ch. 363 1(3) +104,314
Federal funds Ch. 363 2(3) +13,422
Aquatic invasive species
Other funds Ch. 363 1(4) +17,223
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s office
Other funds Ch. 524 2(1) +9,105
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(1) +44,192
Central services
Other funds Ch. 524 2(2) +493,867
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(2) +485,343
Direct services
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 59
Other funds Ch. 524 2(4) +3,049,463
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(4) +2,967,919
Federal funds Ch. 524 5(2) +9,979
Community support and grants
Other funds Ch. 524 2(5) +88,429
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(5) +233,010
Federal funds Ch. 524 5(3) +46,710
Water Resources Department:
Administrative services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(1) +561,183
Other funds Ch. 611 3(1) +79,355
Field services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(2) +1,019,271
Other funds Ch. 611 3(2) +136,551
Water rights and adjudications
General Fund Ch. 611 1(3) +320,708
Other funds Ch. 611 3(3) +151,454
Technical services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(4) +716,011
Other funds Ch. 611 3(4) +159,900
Federal funds Ch. 611 4(4) +14,169
Director’s office
General Fund Ch. 611 1(5) +446,275
Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 527 1(1) +26,915
Other funds Ch. 527 8(1) +186,563
Federal funds Ch. 527 9(1) +136,980
For operating expenses,
activities and projects
Lottery funds Ch. 527 6 +337,730
SECTION 332. Public Safety. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Operations and health services
General Fund Ch. 583 1(1) +53,349,053
Other funds Ch. 583 2(1) +215,246
Central administration and
administrative services
General Fund Ch. 583 1(2) +4,993,036
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 60
Other funds Ch. 583 2(2) +695,991
Correctional services
General Fund Ch. 583 1(3) +5,038,382
Community corrections
General Fund Ch. 583 1(4) +690,569
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 518 1 +455,687
Other funds Ch. 518 3 +8,603
Federal funds Ch. 518 4 +59,626
Department of the State Fire
Marshal:
Office of the State Fire
Marshal
General Fund Ch. 554 1(1) +84,349
Business services
General Fund Ch. 554 1(2) +473,030
Emergency response
General Fund Ch. 554 1(3) +162,864
Fire and life safety
services
General Fund Ch. 554 1(4) +189,425
Fire and life safety
education
General Fund Ch. 554 1(5) +209,226
Office of the State Fire
Marshal, business services,
emergency response, fire and
life safety services, fire
and life safety education
Other funds Ch. 554 2(1) +691,884
Regulatory services
Other funds Ch. 554 2(2) +309,283
District Attorneys:
For the payment of expenses
of district attorneys
General Fund Ch. 421 1 +434,362
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney General
and Administration
General Fund Ch. 523 1(1) +90,359
Other funds Ch. 523 2(1) +2,294,827
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund Ch. 523 1(3) +1,405,195
Other funds Ch. 523 2(5) +215,369
Federal funds Ch. 523 3(2) +22,569
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 523 1(4) +450,298
Other funds Ch. 523 2(6) +109,996
Federal funds Ch. 523 3(3) +198,351
Division of Child Support
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 61
General Fund Ch. 523 1(6) +1,811,446
Other funds Ch. 523 2(9) +384,362
Federal funds Ch. 523 3(4) +4,273,334
Appellate Division
Other funds Ch. 523 2(2) +1,288,575
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds Ch. 523 2(3) +2,380,760
Federal funds Ch. 523 3(1) +301,602
Child Advocacy Division
Other funds Ch. 523 2(4) +4,139,663
General Counsel Division
Other funds Ch. 523 2(7) +3,613,146
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 523 2(8) +3,154,438
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 429 1(1) +445,813
Other funds Ch. 429 2(1) +145,907
Operations
General Fund Ch. 429 1(2) +208,063
Other funds Ch. 429 2(2) +313,225
Federal funds Ch. 429 3(1) +3,512,769
Community support
Other funds Ch. 429 2(3) +205,094
Federal funds Ch. 429 3(2) +841,486
Oregon Department of
Emergency Management:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 423 1(1) +608,233
Other funds Ch. 423 2(1) +50,770
Federal funds Ch. 423 3(1) +30,916
Preparedness and Response
General Fund Ch. 423 1(2) +175,316
Other funds Ch. 423 2(3) +58,805
Federal funds Ch. 423 3(2) +251,438
Mitigation and Recovery
General Fund Ch. 423 1(3) +121,631
Federal funds Ch. 423 3(3) +339,970
9-1-1 Emergency Program
Other funds Ch. 423 2(2) +99,435
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 402 1 +634,946
Department of State Police:
Patrol and Public Safety
Services, Criminal Investigation
and Gaming Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 455 1(1) +10,697,968
Other funds Ch. 455 2(1) +1,240,128
Fish and Wildlife
General Fund Ch. 455 1(2) +454,451
Other funds Ch. 455 2(2) +1,023,534
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 62
Federal funds Ch. 455 3(2) +61,020
Forensic Services and Office
of the Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund Ch. 455 1(3) +2,712,818
Other funds Ch. 455 2(3) +16,730
Office of the Superintendent,
Support Services and Criminal
Justice Info Services
General Fund Ch. 455 1(4) +1,899,486
Other funds Ch. 455 2(4) +1,063,337
Lottery funds Ch. 455 4 +397,235
Patrol and Public Safety
Services and Criminal
Investigation
Federal funds Ch. 455 3(1) -242
Forensic Services
Federal funds Ch. 455 3(3) -365
Oregon Public Defense
Commission:
Executive Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(1) +154,085
Administrative Services
Division: Administrative
services
General Fund Ch. 588
1(10)(a) +906,099
Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(2) +386,710
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(3) +1,449,959
Trial Representation Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(8) +739,183
Financial Case Management
System
Other funds Ch. 628 41 +127,903
Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 403 2(1) +2,771,055
Federal funds Ch. 403 3 +21,519
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility programs
General Fund Ch. 459 1(1) +8,776,939
Other funds Ch. 459 2(1) +33,997
Community programs
General Fund Ch. 459 1(2) +1,521,407
Federal funds Ch. 459 3(1) +236,805
Program support
General Fund Ch. 459 1(3) +2,036,060
Other funds Ch. 459 2(3) +78,460
Federal funds Ch. 459 3(2) +62,942
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 63
SECTION 333. Transportation. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 332 1(1) +161,356
Federal funds Ch. 332 2(1) +19,639
Aircraft registration
Other funds Ch. 332 1(2) +14,165
Pavement maintenance
Other funds Ch. 332 1(3) +15,082
Department of Transportation:
Project delivery and support
General Fund Ch. 634 1(2) +9,378
Other funds Ch. 634 2(3) +17,649,213
Driver and motor vehicle
services
General Fund Ch. 634 1(3) +9,022
Other funds Ch. 634 2(6) +9,245,138
Federal funds Ch. 634 3(1) +121,157
Public transportation
Other funds Ch. 634 2(10) +701,274
Department of Transportation
administrative services
Other funds Ch. 634 2(11) +5,993,158
Finance and budget
Other funds Ch. 634 2(12) +75,541
Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 634 2(2) +13,860,282
Interstate bridge replacement
Other funds Ch. 634 2(4) +519,673
Local government program
Other funds Ch. 634 2(5) +648,165
State Board of Towing
Other funds Ch. 634 2(7) +1,700
Commerce and compliance
Other funds Ch. 634 2(8) +3,517,472
Federal funds Ch. 634 3(2) +85,467
Policy, data and analysis
Other funds Ch. 634 2(9) +2,692,641
Federal funds Ch. 634 3(3) +7,674
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 64
STATEWIDE REDUCTIONS
SECTION 334. Administration. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
For start-up costs associated
with implementing sections
1 to 11, chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2025
General Fund Ch. 481 13 -42,983
To expend for the purposes
described in section 1,
chapter 596, Oregon Laws
2025
General Fund Ch. 596 3 -11,458
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
General Fund Ch. 372 1 -177,062
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
Distilled spirits, public
safety, administration and
agency support
Other funds Ch. 400 1(1) -266,000
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 553
1(1) -1,145,178
Other funds Ch. 553 2(1) -508,112
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 553 1(6) -61,272
Other funds Ch. 553 2(7) -19,008
SECTION 335. Consumer and Business Services.  Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for  the biennium ending June
30, 2027, for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 65
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
New permitting-related
requirements under chapter
486, Oregon Laws 2025
General Fund Ch. 628 205 -31,569
SECTION 336. Economic Development.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 616 8(1) -5,211
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(1) -60,383
Business, innovation and trade
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(2) -3,756
Infrastructure
Lottery funds Ch. 616 11(3) -73,074
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Housing Stabilization Programs
General Fund Ch. 584 1(1) -262,224
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(1) -29,553
Central Services
General Fund Ch. 584 1(6) -579,697
Other funds Ch. 584 2(6) -239,532
Federal funds Ch. 584 4(6) -27,535
For Multifamily Rental Housing
Programs, for deposit into the
General Housing Account created
under ORS 458.620, to be expended
for community housing supporting
agricultural employees
General Fund Ch. 584 6 -2,000,000
Department of Veterans’ Affairs:
Appeals and special advocacy
General Fund Ch. 526 1(2) -27,000
Aging veteran services
Lottery funds Ch. 526 2(4) -23,000
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 66
SECTION 337. Education. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Early Learning
and Care:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 607 1(1) -1,111,000
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 608 1(1) -2,939,067
SECTION 338. Human Services.  Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Health Authority:
For the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section
1, chapter 470, Oregon Laws
2025
General Fund Ch. 470 2 -85,903
Medicaid
General Fund Ch. 587 1(1) -3,296,549
Other funds Ch. 587 2(1) -53,381
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(1) -3,180,661
Behavioral health
General Fund Ch. 587 1(2) -2,222,364
Other funds Ch. 587 2(2) -168,333
Lottery funds Ch. 587 3(2) -182,835
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(2) -499,800
Health policy and analytics
General Fund Ch. 587 1(3) -1,675,123
Other funds Ch. 587 2(3) -3,506
Lottery funds Ch. 587 3(3) -1,411
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(3) -887,852
Public health
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 67
General Fund Ch. 587 1(4) -4,008,243
Other funds Ch. 587 2(5) -53,650
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(4) -451,437
Central services
General Fund Ch. 587 1(6) -2,076,684
Other funds Ch. 587 2(8) -104,477
Lottery funds Ch. 587 3(4) -11,451
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(6) -543,425
State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs
General Fund Ch. 587 1(7) -4,114,749
Other funds Ch. 587 2(9) -736,709
Lottery funds Ch. 587 3(5) -9,149
Federal funds Ch. 587 5(7) -1,610,818
Shared administrative services
Other funds Ch. 587
2(10) -2,468,309
Veterans dental services
Lottery funds Ch. 587 4(2) -1,003
Department of Human Services:
Central services
General Fund Ch. 549 1(1) -549,031
Other funds Ch. 549 2(1) -18,767
Self-sufficiency programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(3) -699,330
Other funds Ch. 549 2(3) -771
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(3) -775,600
Vocational rehabilitation
services
General Fund Ch. 549 1(4) -80,594
Other funds Ch. 549 2(4) -1,374
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(4) -254,263
Child welfare programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(5) -5,981,825
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(5) -2,249,624
Aging and people with
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 549
1(6) -20,143,792
Other funds Ch. 549 2(6) -200,106
Federal funds Ch. 549
3(6) -39,857,500
Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 549 1(7) -6,104,545
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(7) -2,500,049
Oregon Eligibility Partnership
General Fund Ch. 549 1(8) -905,424
Other funds Ch. 549 2(9) -5,882
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(8) -810,453
Shared services
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 68
Other funds Ch. 549 2(8) -517,020
Central services
Federal funds Ch. 549 3(1) -376,695
SECTION 339. Judicial Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Third-party debt collection
General Fund Ch. 522 1(6) -3,000,000
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 398 1(1) -10,912
SECTION 340. Legislative Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Indian Services:
General Fund Ch. 586 17 -13,710
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General program
General Fund Ch. 586 1(1) -2,514,664
Legislative Counsel Committee:
General Fund Ch. 586 11 -729,974
Legislative Assembly:
General Fund Ch. 586 6 -3,027,604
Eighty-third Legislative
Assembly of the State of Oregon
General Fund Ch. 586 7(1) -63,750
Eighty-fourth Legislative
Assembly of the State of Oregon
General Fund Ch. 586 7(2) -1,377,012
Legislative Equity Office:
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 69
General Fund Ch. 586 8 -767,320
Legislative Fiscal Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 14(1) -344,314
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee
General Fund Ch. 586 15 -1,202,908
Legislative Revenue Officer:
General Fund Ch. 586 16 -237,066
SECTION 341. Natural Resources.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and support
services
General Fund Ch. 419 1(1) -236,014
State Department of Energy:
Energy development services
General Fund Ch. 424 1(2) -1,200,000
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Water quality
General Fund Ch. 426 1(2) -162,000
Agency management
General Fund Ch. 426 1(4) -695,445
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(1) -79,853
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(2) -66,820
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 520 1(3) -13,326
State Department of Geology
and Mineral Industries:
Geologic survey
General Fund Ch. 521 1(1) -109,744
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
Planning program
General Fund Ch. 551 1(1) -540,539
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 70
Other funds Ch. 551 2(1) -162,157
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund
programs
Other funds Ch. 338 1(1) +221,288
Wetland mitigation and
land use permitting
General Fund Ch. 628 15 -221,288
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s office
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(1) -310,760
Central services
Other funds Ch. 524 2(2) -78,889
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(2) -78,149
Parks development
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(3) -2,973,814
Direct services
Other funds Ch. 524 2(4) -372,996
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(4) -363,432
Community support
and grants
Lottery funds Ch. 524 3(5) -1,242,052
Water Resources Department:
Administrative services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(1) -56,000
Field services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(2) -123,000
Technical services
General Fund Ch. 611 1(4) -100,486
Director’s office
General Fund Ch. 611 1(5) -16,000
SECTION 342. Public Safety. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2025
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Operations and health services
General Fund Ch. 583 1(1) -2,210,796
Central administration and
administrative services
General Fund Ch. 583 1(2) -603,086
Correctional services
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 71
General Fund Ch. 583 1(3) -192,284
Community corrections
General Fund Ch. 583 1(4) -34,834
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 518 1 -137,667
Department of the State Fire
Marshal:
Business services
General Fund Ch. 554 1(2) -204,152
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 523 1(1) -2,216,390
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 429 1(1) -11,000
Oregon Department of
Emergency Management:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 423 1(1) -129,981
Federal funds Ch. 423 3(1) +129,981
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 402 1 -32,288
Oregon Public Defense
Commission:
Executive Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(1) -50,000
Special Programs, Contracts
and Distributions Division:
Law schools
General Fund Ch. 588
1(11)(c) -321,412
Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(2) -612,415
Trial Representation Division
General Fund Ch. 588 1(8) -313,000
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility programs
General Fund Ch. 459 1(1) -818,743
Community programs
General Fund Ch. 459 1(2) -3,122,956
Program support
General Fund Ch. 459 1(3) -338,176
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 72
SECTION 343. The unit and section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law  of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 344. This 2026 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5204 (HB 5204-A) Page 73